District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.17

Hearings.

(a)

Except in the case of a summary suspension as provided in § 7-2341.16, before the Mayor denies an application for initial or renewal licensure or certification, or suspends or revokes a license or certification, or imposes a civil fine, the Mayor shall give the person, or the owner or operator of the agency, vehicle, or facility, against whom the action is contemplated written notice of the contemplated action. The notice must inform the affected person or entity of the reason for the action and of the right to request a hearing.

(b)

If requested, the hearing shall be conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 18, 56 DCR 1167
This section is referenced in § 7-2341.15.